dictsource/lv_rules
.group os
       ap) ostrof          ostRo:f
      atm) os              os
   _blont) os (_           uos       // Blontos
        b) os (L01_        os        // boss
     _cit) os (_           uos       // citos
     _dat) os (_           uos
       _d) osto (jevskL02_ osto      // Dostojevskis
       ep) os (L01_        os        // ..eposs
        f) osfo            osfo:
  _gr) osto (nL04_         osto:     // Grostona
       iz) os              uos
      kāp) os (t           uos
        k) os (in          os
        k) os (m           os
       _k) osmo (sL01_     osmo      // kosmoss
        k) os (tīm         os
       kr) os              os
        l) os (j           os
        n) os (tat         uos
           os (cil         os
        _) os (karL01_     os        // Oskars
           os (maL80       os        // osman
           os (mo          os
           osto (L65       uostuo
           os (t_          uos
     _pat) os (L01_        os        // patoss
        p) os (m           uos
        p) os (tC@         os
        p) os (te          os
        p) os (ter         os
        p) os (tind        os
        p) os (tī          uos
        p) os (tL01        uos
        p) os (tL55m       os
        p) os (to          uos
        p) os (tul         os
       pr) os (p           os
       pr) os (t           os
      rib) oso             oso:
        r) os (ij          os
        r) os (tb          os
      spr) ost             uost
    _ster) os (_           uos       // steros
        š) os (ej          os
       _t) os (te          os
       _t) os (tL01_       os        // tosts
        v) osto (k         osto
       _z) os (L06_        uos       // zoss

.group ot

       an) ot              ot
      ast) ot              uot
       av) ot              uot
     _bal) ot (ē           ot
    bankr) ot              ot
        b) ot (ān          ot
       _b) ot (u_          ot
        d) ot (āc          ot
        d) ot (ē           ot
       _d) ot (s_          uo`t
       er) ot (iL67        o:t
       er) ot (is          o:t
      _er) ot (L01_        ot        // Erots
      _ez) ot              ot
        f) oto (_          oto:
        g) ot (ik          o:t
        g) ot (is          o:t
       _j) ot (L04_        ot        // jota
      kab) ot              ot
   _kašal) ot (L01_        ot        // kašalots
        k) ot (an          ot
        k) ot (L51         ot
        k) ot (l           ot
       kv) ot (L04         o:t
   _L30pr) ot (L13_        uot       // (ne|sa..)prot(i|u)
      lin) ot (ip          ot
        l) ot (er          ot
       _l) ot (iņL04       ot        // Lotiņa
        l) ot (L05_        ot        // ..lote
       _l) oto (sL01_      oto       // lotoss
      mel) ot              uot
        m) ot (L52         ot
        m) oto             oto:
        m) otō             oto:
     nepr) ot              uot
       _n) ot (L04_        ot        // nota
        n) ot (L50r        ot
           ot (āj          uot
           ot (k           ot
           ot (L01_+       uot
        _) oto (C<         oto
      pil) ot              ot
       _p) ot (ašL04       ot        // potaša
        p) ot (eL68        ot
       pr) ot (am          uot
       pr) ot (e           ot
       pr) ot (est+        ot
       pr) ot (o           ot
       pr) oto (š          uotuo     // protoš..
       pr) otot (ip        otot
       pr) oto (t          uotuo     // ..protot
  publisk) ot              uot
        r) ot (āc          ot
        r) ot (b           ot
        r) ot (er          ot
        r) ot (ē           ot
        r) ot (kaL77       uo`t
      sab) ot              ot
       sk) ot (ijL04_      ot
       sk) ot (L01_        ot
       sl) ot (L04_        uot       // slota
       sp) ot (+           ot
        t) ot (ēm          ot
        t) ot (L50l        ot
       _v) ot (_++++++     ot        // vot
      zem) ot              uot
      zig) ot (L01_        ot        // ..zigots
      zig) ot (L04_        ot        // ..zigota

.group ou
       dž) ou (l           ou
           ou              ou

.group ov
       _k) ov (ārnL02_     uov       // kovārnis
        k) ov              ov
        n) ov (ad          uov
        n) ov (at          ov
        n) ov (āci         ov
        n) ov (āc          uov
        n) ov (elL05_      ov        // novele
       _n) ov (emb         ov        // novembris
        n) ov (ēr          uov
        n) ov (it          ov
        n) ov (L04_        ov        // nova
        n) ov (o           ov
           ov (āc          ov
      _pl) ov (L01_        ov        // plovs
       pr) ov (an          ov
       pr) ov (in          ov
       pr) ov (L05_        uov       // prove
       pr) ov (L52z        ov
       pr) ovo             ovo
        r) ov              ov
       sl) ov              ov
        s) ov              ov
       _š) ov (biz         ov
       _š) ov (L01_        ov        // šovs
       _š) ov (vin         ov
      tet) ov              ov

.group oz
       _b) oz (a_          uoz       // boza
    celul) oz              o:z
       _d) oz (L04_        o:z       // doza
       _d) oz (L05_        uoz       // doze
        d) oz              oz
      gar) oz              uoz
      _gr) oz (nij         oz        // from Russian
       gr) oz (+           uoz
       _j) oz (a_          uoz       // joza
       kl) oz (et          oz
        k) ozlov           ozlov
        l) oz (ung         oz
    maijr) oz (īL88        uoz
        m) oz (aī          oz
       _m) oz (L03_        o:z       // Mozus
       _n) oz              uoz
           oz (L01_        o:z       // ..ozs
      @@)  oz (L05_        o:z       // ..oze
           ozo (lL01_      uozuo     // ..ozols
           oz (on          oz
           ozo (_          o:zuo
        p) oz              oz
       _r) oz (eL88L05_    oz        // rozete
       _r) oz (īL80L05_    oz        // rozīne
  skandal) oz              o:z
       sp) oz (m           uoz
       _š) oz (iem_        uoz       // šoziem
       _t) oz (iem_        uoz       // toziem

.group ō
           ō               o:
?2         ō               uo        // ō as uo for Latgalian

.group ȯ
           ȯ               o         // short o

.group p
           p               p
        _) pie (A          pie_|
        _) pie (e+         pie_!
        _) pus (vien       p%us      // pus..number stress on next syllable
        _) pus (div        p%us
        _) pus (otr        p%us
        _) pus (trij       p%us
        _) pus (trīs       p%us
        _) pus (četr       p%us
        _) pus (piec       p%us
        _) pus (seš        p%us
        _) pus (sept       p%us
        _) pus (astoņ      p%us
        _) pus (deviņ      p%us
        _) pus (desmit     p%us

.group pr
        _) pro             pro

.group q
           q (A            kv
           q (C            ku

.group r
           r               R

.group ŗ
           ŗ               r

.group s
           sh              s_!h_!    // probably no need to make distinct in other places
        _) s (L61          s_        // make s distinct at start of the word before unvocied consonants
           s               s

.group š
           š               S

.group t
           t               t

.group u
           u               u
           ui              ui
           u (u            u_|
     L41J) uo              u_|o
           uo              uo
.group ū
           ū               u:

.group v
           v               v
                                       // unstressed if starts as vis.. prefix
                                       // except for words where vis.. is part of root
           vecvec          vetsvets
        _) vi (sād         v'i         // visād
        _) vi (sēd         v'i         // visēd
        _) vi (skijL01_    v'i         // viskijs
           vi (skoz        v'i         // viskoz..
        _) vi (sL01_       v'i         // viss
        _) vi (sL04_       v'i         // visa
        _) vi (spasaul     v'i         // vispasaul..
        _) vis (pārēj      vis (P3
           vi (spār        v'i         // vispār..
           vi (stiņ        v'i         // vistiņ..
        _) vi (stk         v'i         // vistk..
        _) vi (stL04_      v'i         // vista
        _) vi (sum         v'i         // visum
        _) vi (sur         v'i         // visur
        _) vi (sval        v'i         // Visval..
        _) vi (svar        v'i         // Visvar..
        _) vis             v%is (P3
           visvis          v%isv%is (P6 // visvis..
        _) vi (szinL02_    v'i         // viszinis
        _) vi (szinL05_    v'i         // viszine

.group w
           w               v

.group x
           x               ks
        C) x               _ks

.group y
           y               y            // y is used instead of simple "i", to distinguish them in writing
           y (A            y_|
?2         y (A            y            // no breaking pause for Latgalian e.g. myusu
           y (_            y:           // for international words
           y (outub        y

.group z
           z               z
        i) z (v            z
           z (n            z-
           z (v            z-

.group ž
           ž               Z

// Other characters

.group

           ! (\!
           . (.            _:
           '
       \.) .
       \#) #
     \#\#) # (_            _::
       A_) - (_D           _
       A_) #               Resti:te
       C_) - (_D           _
       C_) #               Resti:te
       D_) : (_DD_                   // omit colon in time, eg: 2:30
       __) - (_D           mi:nus
           $               dola:rs
           !               _:izsaukumzi:me_:
           :               ko:ls
           >=              l'iela:ks||,vai||v'iena:ds
           <=              maza:ks||,vai||v'iena:ds
           !=              nav||viena:ds

// If Cyrillic is found, translate as Russian

           а   _^_ru
           б   _^_ru
           в   _^_ru
           г   _^_ru
           д   _^_ru
           е   _^_ru
           ё   _^_ru
           ж   _^_ru
           з   _^_ru
           и   _^_ru
           й   _^_ru
           к   _^_ru
           л   _^_ru
           м   _^_ru
           н   _^_ru
           о   _^_ru
           п   _^_ru
           р   _^_ru
           с   _^_ru
           т   _^_ru
           у   _^_ru
           ф   _^_ru
           х   _^_ru
           ц   _^_ru
           ч   _^_ru
           ш   _^_ru
           щ   _^_ru
           ъ   _^_ru
           ы   _^_ru
           ь   _^_ru
           э   _^_ru
           ю   _^_ru
           я   _^_ru
